dev/adv.dix
    <pardef n="i measc/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anuraidh/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/riamh__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>riamh</l><r>riamh<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>ariamh</l><r>riamh<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ans/in__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>in</l><r>in<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>in</l><r>in<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" a="irishfst"><p><l>an</l><r>in<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" a="irishfst"><p><l>an</l><r>in<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="eadhón/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="le gairid/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fadó/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cár/__adv.itg">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv.itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fosta/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="beagnach/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="c/homh__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>homh</l><r>homh<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>ho</l><r>homh<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>hó</l><r>homh<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>omh</l><r>homh<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="siar/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aníos/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sonraíoch/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anocht/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="timpeall/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ó dheas/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aniar/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="túisce/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anall/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="feasta/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dáirír/e__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" a="irishfst"><p><l>ibh</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" a="irishfst"><p><l>í</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amú/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="inni/u__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" a="irishfst"><p><l>ubh</l><r>u<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" a="irishfst"><p><l>bh</l><r>u<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="istoíche/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="isteach/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ansiúd/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="taobh istigh/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="theas/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ans/eo__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>eo</l><r>eo<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" a="irishfst"><p><l>o</l><r>eo<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="thart/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="laistigh/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="inné/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="araon/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amhlaidh/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/anois__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>anois</l><r>anois<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>Anois</l><r>anois<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dá bharr sin/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="eadhon/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="thoir/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="freisin/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="thiar/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sách/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tr/á__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>á</l><r>á<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>a</l><r>á<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="iontach/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="suas/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="go leor/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="síos/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aneas/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cho/íche__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>íche</l><r>íche<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" a="irishfst"><p><l>idhchin</l><r>íche<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR" a="irishfst"><p><l>idhche</l><r>íche<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cuíosach/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fiú/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="arís/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>t</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="thar a bheith/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="damanta/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="conas/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="minic/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cá/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>r</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>rb</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l>rbh</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="thuas/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="amainiris/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="áfach/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="in airde/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="réasúnta/__adv">
      <e a="irishfst"><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="anois" a="irishfst"><par n="/anois__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="istoíche" a="irishfst"><i>istoíche</i><par n="istoíche/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="damanta" a="irishfst"><i>damanta</i><par n="damanta/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cár" a="irishfst"><i>cár</i><par n="cár/__adv.itg"/></e>
    <e lm="síos" a="irishfst"><i>síos</i><par n="síos/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aniar" a="irishfst"><i>aniar</i><par n="aniar/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="thiar" a="irishfst"><i>thiar</i><par n="thiar/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aníos" a="irishfst"><i>aníos</i><par n="aníos/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="inniu" a="irishfst"><i>inni</i><par n="inni/u__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="conas" a="irishfst"><i>conas</i><par n="conas/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="theas" a="irishfst"><i>theas</i><par n="theas/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="chomh" a="irishfst"><i>c</i><par n="c/homh__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="laistigh" a="irishfst"><i>laistigh</i><par n="laistigh/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="thart" a="irishfst"><i>thart</i><par n="thart/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fiú" a="irishfst"><i>fiú</i><par n="fiú/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="freisin" a="irishfst"><i>freisin</i><par n="freisin/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="amhlaidh" a="irishfst"><i>amhlaidh</i><par n="amhlaidh/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="timpeall" a="irishfst"><i>timpeall</i><par n="timpeall/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="isteach" a="irishfst"><i>isteach</i><par n="isteach/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eadhón" a="irishfst"><i>eadhón</i><par n="eadhón/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="choíche" a="irishfst"><i>cho</i><par n="cho/íche__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dáiríre" a="irishfst"><i>dáirír</i><par n="dáirír/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="riamh" a="irishfst"><par n="/riamh__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="i measc" a="irishfst"><i>i measc</i><par n="i measc/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="amú" a="irishfst"><i>amú</i><par n="amú/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="inné" a="irishfst"><i>inné</i><par n="inné/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="feasta" a="irishfst"><i>feasta</i><par n="feasta/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fosta" a="irishfst"><i>fosta</i><par n="fosta/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ansin" a="irishfst"><i>ans</i><par n="ans/in__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cuíosach" a="irishfst"><i>cuíosach</i><par n="cuíosach/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anseo" a="irishfst"><i>ans</i><par n="ans/eo__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="thoir" a="irishfst"><i>thoir</i><par n="thoir/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anuraidh" a="irishfst"><i>anuraidh</i><par n="anuraidh/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ó dheas" a="irishfst"><i>ó dheas</i><par n="ó dheas/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fadó" a="irishfst"><i>fadó</i><par n="fadó/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="túisce" a="irishfst"><i>túisce</i><par n="túisce/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="beagnach" a="irishfst"><i>beagnach</i><par n="beagnach/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="suas" a="irishfst"><i>suas</i><par n="suas/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eadhon" a="irishfst"><i>eadhon</i><par n="eadhon/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sách" a="irishfst"><i>sách</i><par n="sách/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="taobh istigh" a="irishfst"><i>taobh istigh</i><par n="taobh istigh/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aneas" a="irishfst"><i>aneas</i><par n="aneas/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="thar a bheith" a="irishfst"><i>thar a bheith</i><par n="thar a bheith/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dá bharr sin" a="irishfst"><i>dá bharr sin</i><par n="dá bharr sin/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="go leor" a="irishfst"><i>go leor</i><par n="go leor/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ansiúd" a="irishfst"><i>ansiúd</i><par n="ansiúd/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="arís" a="irishfst"><i>arís</i><par n="arís/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sonraíoch" a="irishfst"><i>sonraíoch</i><par n="sonraíoch/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="iontach" a="irishfst"><i>iontach</i><par n="iontach/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anall" a="irishfst"><i>anall</i><par n="anall/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="trá" a="irishfst"><i>tr</i><par n="tr/á__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="siar" a="irishfst"><i>siar</i><par n="siar/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="araon" a="irishfst"><i>araon</i><par n="araon/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anocht" a="irishfst"><i>anocht</i><par n="anocht/__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="le gairid" a="irishfst"><i>le gairid</i><par n="le gairid/__adv"/></e>
